Washington statutes.
RCW 7.52.430

Duties of clerk in making investments.

The clerk in whose name a security is taken, or by whom an investment is made, and his or her successors in office, shall receive the interest and principal as it becomes due, and apply and invest the same as the court may direct, and shall file in his or her office all securities taken and keep an account in a book provided and kept for that purpose in the clerk's office, free for inspection by all persons, of investments and moneys received by him or her thereon, and the disposition thereof.

[ 2011 c 336 s 231; Code 1881 s 594; 1877 p 123 s 599; 1869 p 141 s 548; RRS s 880.]